Georgia, session 2025_26, HB319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 5 of Chapter 11 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia, relating to offenses
involving illegal aliens, is amended by revising subsection (d) of Code Section 16-11-201,
relating to definitions, offense of concealing, harboring, or shielding an illegal alien,
penalties, and exceptions, as follows:
"(d) It shall be unlawful for any state or local official or employee to knowingly and
willfully violate any state law related to deterring the concealing, harboring, or shielding
of an illegal alien guilty of a criminal offense in violation of this Code section. In addition
to the penalties provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, any state or local official
or employee found to have violated this Code section shall be subject to prosecution by the
Attorney General, and may be subject to removal and replacement by the Governor. This
H. B. 319
- 1 -

LC 48 1438
Code section shall not apply to a government employee or any person acting at the express
direction of a government employee who conceals, harbors, or shelters an illegal alien
when such illegal alien is or has been the victim of a criminal offense or is a witness in any
civil or criminal proceeding or who holds an illegal alien in a jail, prison, or other detention
facility."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 319
- 2 -